Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.405

Emergency situations—Special local needs—Experimental use permits.

For the purpose of exercising the authority granted to the state under the provisions of FIFRA, the director may:

(1) Meet emergency conditions in this state by applying for an exemption from any provision of FIFRA as provided for by section 18 of that act. If such exemption is granted by the administrator of EPA the director may carry out and enforce the requirements and conditions of the exemption;

(2) Comply with the requirements necessary to issue special local needs registration under section 24(c) of FIFRA; and

(3) Comply with the requirements necessary to issue experimental use permits under section 5(f) of FIFRA.

[ 1979 c 146 s 5.]